Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
IMPRISONMENT

Law Journals and Reviews

The Abandonment of Punishment. 16 HBJ, no. 2, at 63 (1981).

§706-656 Terms of imprisonment for first
and second degree murder and attempted first and second degree murder.
(1) Persons eighteen years of age or over at the time of the offense who are
convicted of first degree murder or first degree attempted murder shall be
sentenced to life imprisonment without the possibility of parole.

As part of such sentence, the court shall order
the director of public safety and the Hawaii paroling authority to prepare an
application for the governor to commute the sentence to life imprisonment with
parole at the end of twenty years of imprisonment; provided that persons who
are repeat offenders under section 706-606.5 shall serve at least the
applicable mandatory minimum term of imprisonment.

Persons under the age of eighteen years at the
time of the offense who are convicted of first degree murder or first degree
attempted murder shall be sentenced to life imprisonment with the possibility
of parole.

(2) Except as provided in section 706-657,
pertaining to enhanced sentence for second degree murder, persons convicted of
second degree murder and attempted second degree murder shall be sentenced to
life imprisonment with possibility of parole. The minimum length of
imprisonment shall be determined by the Hawaii paroling authority; provided
that persons who are repeat offenders under section 706-606.5 shall serve at
least the applicable mandatory minimum term of imprisonment.

If the court imposes a sentence of life
imprisonment without possibility of parole pursuant to section 706-657, as part
of that sentence, the court shall order the director of public safety and the
Hawaii paroling authority to prepare an application for the governor to commute
the sentence to life imprisonment with parole at the end of twenty years of
imprisonment; provided that persons who are repeat offenders under section
706-606.5 shall serve at least the applicable mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment. [L 1986, c 314, §39; am L 1987, c 181, §6 and c 338, §10; am L
1989, c 211, §8; am L 1993, c 271, §2; am L 1996, c 15, §1; am L 2014, c 202,
§2]

Note

The 2014 amendment applies to proceedings arising on or after
July 2, 2014 and to proceedings that were begun but not concluded before July
2, 2014. L 2014, c 202, §6.

COMMENTARY ON §706-656

Act 271, Session Laws 1993, amended this section to provide
that in cases designated under §706-657, the person may be sentenced to life
imprisonment without possibility of parole. The legislature felt that the
court should have the discretion to determine when the circumstances of the
murder justify the enhanced sentence, and that this discretion should be
limited to those situations demonstrating exceptional depravity. House
Standing Committee Report No. 1171, Senate Standing Committee Report No. 689.

Act 202, Session Laws 2014, amended subsection (1) by
applying a sentence of life imprisonment without the possibility of parole to
persons eighteen years of age or over at the time of the offense who are
convicted of first degree murder or first degree attempted murder; and
requiring that persons under eighteen years of age at the time of the offense
who are convicted of first degree murder or first degree attempted murder are
sentenced to life imprisonment with the possibility of parole. The legislature
found that Hawaii is one of the few states that still allow life sentences
without the possibility of parole for juvenile offenders. International law
prohibits life sentence without parole for juvenile offenders under the age of
eighteen at the time the crime is committed. The United States is the only
country in the world that sentences its children to a lifetime of
incarceration. In Miller v. Alabama, 132 S. Ct. 2455 (2012), the U.S. Supreme
Court held that mandatory life sentences without parole for those under the age
of eighteen at the time of their crimes violate the Eighth Amendment's
prohibition on cruel and unusual punishments. The legislature also recognized
that mitigating factors may exist for cases involving a juvenile offender. In
Miller, the Supreme Court stated that youth is a moment and "condition of
life when a person may be most susceptible to influence and to psychological
damage." Therefore, the legislature encouraged the sentencing judge to
take into account and consider any mitigating factors for cases involving a
juvenile offender. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3248, Conference
Committee Report No. 56-14.

Case Notes

For sentencing purposes, conspiracy to commit second degree
murder is a class C felony under §706-610 and subject to the sentencing
provisions of §706-660, not this section. 84 H. 280, 933 P.2d 617 (1997).

Sentence for murder not an extended term. 6 H. App. 409, 723
P.2d 186 (1986).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next